Hawaii statutes.
§269E-4 One call center advisory committee.
(a) The commission shall establish a one call center advisory committee as a
governmental entity as defined under chapter 662D to advise the commission in
implementing this chapter. The committee shall consist of seventeen voting
members and one ex officio nonvoting member. Of the voting members:

(1) Eleven shall be appointed by the commission to
serve until successors are appointed by the commission. The appointments shall
be as follows:

(A) One from the gas utility industry;

(B) One from the electric utility industry;

(C) One from the telecommunications utility
industry;

(D) One from the pipeline operator industry;

(E) Two from the General Contractors
Association of Hawaii;

(F) Two from the Building Industry
Association of Hawaii;

(G) One from the cable service industry;

(H) One from the water utility
industry; and

(I) One from the wastewater industry;

(2) One shall be the representative of the city and
county of Honolulu designated by the mayor of the city and county of Honolulu;

(3) One shall be the representative of the county of
Hawaii designated by the mayor of the county of Hawaii;

(4) One shall be the representative of the county of
Maui designated by the mayor of the county of Maui;

(5) One shall be the representative of the county of
Kauai designated by the mayor of the county of Kauai;

(6) One shall be the director of the state department
of transportation, or the director's representative; and

(7) One shall be the executive director of the
division of consumer advocacy, department of commerce and consumer affairs, or
the executive director's representative.

A representative of the center shall serve as an ex
officio nonvoting member of the committee.

(b) No member shall receive any compensation
for the member's services.

(c) The committee shall advise the commission
on:

(1) The establishment of rules;

(2) The
setting of appropriate fees and assessments for the administration and
operation of the center;

(3) The
selection of the center provider;

(4) The enforcement of this chapter; and

(5) Other aspects regarding the establishment and
operation of the center;

provided that the committee shall not advise the
commission in the exercise of the commission's quasi-judicial, adjudicatory
functions, or participate in the commission's deliberations. The committee
shall be exempt from chapter 92. [L 2004, c 141, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 95, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next